Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-429
Citation; cited person to medical facility; when.

Notwithstanding that a citation is issued, a peace officer is authorized to take a cited person to an appropriate medical facility if he appears mentally or physically unable to care for himself.

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 8.